Missouri, session 2026, SB1109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 600.063, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 600.063,
to read as follows:
600.063. 1. Upon approval by the director or the
commission, any district defender may file a motion to
request a conference to discuss caseload issues involving
any individual public defender or defenders, but not the
entire office, with the presiding judge of any circuit court
served by the district office. The motion shall state the
reasons why the individual public defender or public
defenders will be unable to provide effective assistance of
counsel due to caseload concerns. When a motion to request
a conference has been filed, the clerk of the court shall
immediately provide a copy of the motion to the prosecuting
or circuit attorney who serves the circuit court.
2. If the presiding judge approves the motion, a date
for the conference shall be set within thirty days of the
filing of the motion. The court shall provide notice of the
conference date and time to the district defender and the
prosecuting or circuit attorney.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1109 2
3. Within thirty days of the conference, the presiding
judge shall issue an order either granting or denying
relief. If relief is granted, it shall be based upon a
finding that the individual public defender or defenders
will be unable to provide effective assistance of counsel
due to caseload issues. The judge may order one or more of
the following types of relief in any appropriate combination:
(1) Appoint private counsel to represent any eligible
defendant pursuant to the provisions of section 600.064;
(2) Investigate the financial status of any defendant
determined to be eligible for public defender representation
under section 600.086 and make findings regarding the
eligibility of such defendants;
(3) Determine, with the express concurrence of the
prosecuting or circuit attorney, whether any cases can be
disposed of without the imposition of a jail or prison
sentence and allow such cases to proceed without the
provision of counsel to the defendant;
(4) Modify the conditions of release ordered in any
case in which the defendant is being represented by a public
defender, including, but not limited to, reducing the amount
of any bond required for release; and
(5) [Place cases on a waiting list for defender
services, taking into account the seriousness of the case,
the incarceration status of the defendant, and such other
special circumstances as may be brought to the attention of
the court by the prosecuting or circuit attorney, the
district defender, or other interested parties; and
(6)] Grant continuances.
4. Upon receiving the order, the prosecuting or
circuit attorney and the district defender shall have ten
days to file an application for review to the appropriate

SB 1109 3
appellate court. Such appeal shall be expedited by the
court in every manner practicable.
5. Nothing in this section shall deny any party the
right to seek any relief authorized by law nor shall any
provisions of this section be construed as providing a basis
for a claim for post-conviction relief by a defendant.
6. The commission and the supreme court may make such
rules and regulations to implement this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created by the commission under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2013, shall be invalid and void.
✓